District of Columbia statutes.
16-2314

Consent decree.

(a)

At any time after the filing of a delinquency or need of supervision petition and prior to adjudication at a factfinding hearing, the Division may, on motion of the Corporation Counsel or counsel for the child, suspend the proceedings and continue the child under supervision, without commitment, under terms and conditions established by rules of the Superior Court. Such a consent decree shall not be entered unless the child is represented by counsel and has been informed of the consequences of the decree; nor shall it be entered over the objection of the child or of the Corporation Counsel.

(b)

A consent decree shall remain in force for six months unless the child is sooner discharged by the Director of Social Services. Upon application of the Director of Social Services or an agency supervising the child made prior to the expiration of the decree, a consent decree may, after notice and hearing, be extended for not more than six additional months by order of the Division.

(c)

If prior to the expiration of the decree or discharge by the Director of Social Services, the child fails to fulfill the express conditions of the decree or a new delinquency or need of supervision petition is filed concerning the child, the original petition under which the decree was filed may, in the discretion of the Corporation Counsel following consultation with the Director of Social Services, be reinstated. The child shall thereafter be held accountable on the original petition as if the consent decree had never been entered.

(d)

If a child completes the period of continuance under supervision in accordance with the consent decree or is sooner discharged by the Director of Social Services, the Division shall dismiss the original petition.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 590, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 532, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)

History

1981 Ed., § 16-2314.
1973 Ed., § 16-2314.

Prior Codifications